Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-2] Definitions. In this
chapter:

"Account" means an arrangement under
a terms-of-service agreement in which a custodian carries, maintains,
processes, receives, or stores a digital asset of the user or provides goods or
services to the user.

"Agent" means an attorney-in-fact
granted authority under a durable or nondurable power of attorney.

"Carries" means engages in the
transmission of an electronic communication.

"Catalogue of electronic
communications" means information that identifies each person with which a
user has had an electronic communication, the time and date of the
communication, and the electronic address of the person.

"Conservator" means a person
appointed by a court to manage the estate of a living individual. The term
includes a limited conservator.

"Content of an electronic
communication" means information concerning the substance or meaning of
the communication which:

(1) Has been sent or received by a user;

(2) Is in electronic storage by a custodian providing
an electronic communication service to the public or is carried or maintained
by a custodian providing a remote computing service to the public; and

(3) Is not readily accessible to the public.

"Court" means the circuit court in
this State having jurisdiction in matters relating to powers of attorney, in
the case of a fiduciary or agent acting under a will or power of attorney; a
circuit court in this State having jurisdiction in matters relating to the
affairs of decedents, in the case of a personal representative; a circuit court
in this State having jurisdiction in matters relating to the affairs of
decedents or the family court, depending on which court has subject matter
jurisdiction under section 560:5-106, in the case of a conservatorship; or a
court that has jurisdiction under section 560:7-204, in the case of a trustee
acting under a trust.

"Custodian" means a person that
carries, maintains, processes, receives, or stores a digital asset of a user.

"Designated recipient" means a person
chosen by a user using an online tool to administer digital assets of the user.

"Digital asset" means an electronic
record in which an individual has a right or interest. The term does not
include an underlying asset or liability unless the asset or liability is
itself an electronic record.

"Electronic" means relating to
technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

"Electronic communication" has the
meaning set forth in title 18 U.S.C. section 2510(12).

"Electronic communication service"
means a custodian that provides to a user the ability to send or receive an
electronic communication.

"Fiduciary" means an original,
additional, or successor personal representative, conservator, agent, or
trustee.

"Information" means data, text,
images, videos, sounds, codes, computer programs, software, databases, or the
like.

"Online tool" means an electronic
service provided by a custodian that allows the user, in an agreement distinct
from the terms-of-service agreement between the custodian and user, to provide
directions for disclosure or nondisclosure of digital assets to a third person.

"Person" means an individual, estate,
business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

"Personal representative" means an
executor, administrator, special administrator, or person that performs
substantially the same function under the law of this State other than this
chapter.

"Power of attorney" means a record
that grants an agent authority to act in the place of a principal.

"Principal" means an individual who
grants authority to an agent in a power of attorney.

"Protected person" means an
individual for whom a conservator has been appointed. The term includes an
individual for whom an application for the appointment of a conservator is
pending.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Remote computing service" means a
custodian that provides to a user computer-processing services or the storage
of digital assets by means of an electronic communications system, as defined
in title 18 U.S.C. section 2510(14).

"Terms-of-service agreement" means an
agreement that controls the relationship between a user and a custodian.

"Trustee" means a fiduciary with
legal title to property under an agreement or declaration that creates a
beneficial interest in another. The term includes a successor trustee.

"User" means a person that has an
account with a custodian.

"Will" includes a codicil,
testamentary instrument that only appoints an executor, and instrument that
revokes or revises a testamentary instrument. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next